Hawaii statutes.
[§342H-2.5] Department of health;
delegation of enforcement powers. The department, pursuant to rules
adopted in accordance with chapter 91, may delegate to agencies of the various
counties the powers or authority vested in the department to investigate
alleged violations of section 342H-30(c). [L 1994, c 210, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next